Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Southern Regional Wastewater Management District
[Repealed]

§§ 49-17-161 through 49-17-209.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2006, ch. 546, § 39, effective July 1, 2007.

§49-17-161. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-162. [Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-163. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-165. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-167. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-169. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-171. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-173. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-175. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-177. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 321, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1993).]

§49-17-179. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-181. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-183. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-185. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-187. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-189. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-191. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-193. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-195. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-197. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-199. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-201. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-203. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-205. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-207. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]

§49-17-209. [Laws, 1980, ch. 519, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1980).]